Florida, session 2026, SB1124.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âParagraph (f) is added to subsection (3) of 15 section 406.11, Florida Statutes, as created by SB 188, 2026 16 Regular Session, to read: 17 406.11âExaminations, investigations, and autopsies.â 18 (3)â 19 (f)âAn autopsy report of an autopsy performed pursuant to 20 paragraph (b) or paragraph (c) of an infant or a child who dies 21 suddenly and unexpectedly or of an individual of any age whose 22 death is suspected to be caused by SADS held by a medical 23 examiner is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution, except that: 25 1.âThe surviving parents and adult siblings of the deceased 26 may view and copy the autopsy report. 27 2.âThe autopsy report may be released to the Department of 28 Health upon request as needed in connection with the performance 29 of its epidemiological research and tracking duties. The 30 Department of Health shall maintain the confidential and exempt 31 status of any such autopsy report it receives. 32 3.âInformation contained in an autopsy report, including 33 personal health information, may be submitted to a public health 34 authority in accordance with 45 C.F.R. ss. 164.500â164.535. 35 4.âDeidentified information and aggregate data extracted 36 from autopsy reports prepared pursuant to this subsection may be 37 released to national research institutions for purposes of 38 epidemiological research and tracking. 39 40 This paragraph is subject to the Open Government Sunset Review 41 Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on 42 October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from repeal through 43 reenactment by the Legislature. 44 Section 2.âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 45 necessity that autopsy reports of an infant or a child who dies 46 suddenly and unexpectedly or of an individual of any age whose 47 death is suspected to be caused by Sudden Arrhythmic Death 48 Syndrome which are held by a medical examiner or the Department 49 of Health be made confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), 50 Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State 51 Constitution. Section 406.11(3), Florida Statutes, requires that 52 autopsies in such sudden and unexpected deaths include 53 microscopic and toxicology studies and a review of the 54 deceasedâs immunization and medical records to prepare the 55 autopsy report. The Legislature finds that autopsy reports in 56 such cases will include findings of a sensitive nature, the 57 release of which could result in emotional injury to the 58 immediate family of the deceased and detract from the memory of 59 the deceased. The Legislature recognizes that the existence of 60 the Internet and the proliferation of personal computers and 61 cellular telephones throughout the world encourages and promotes 62 the wide dissemination of such reports and that widespread 63 unauthorized dissemination of such reports could subject the 64 immediate family of the deceased to continuous injury. 65 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect on the same date that 66 SB 188 or similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation 67 is adopted in the same legislative session or an extension 68 thereof and becomes a law.